Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 4. Conduct of Election; Election Results.
§ 24.2-680.
Certificates of election.

Subject to the requirements of §

24.2-948.2

, the State Board shall without delay complete and transmit to each of the persons declared to be elected a certificate of his election, certified by it under its seal of office. In the election of a member of the United States Congress, it shall also forward a certificate of election to the clerk of the United States Senate or House of Representatives, as appropriate. The names of members elected to the General Assembly shall be certified by the State Board to the clerk of the House of Delegates or Senate, as appropriate. The names of the persons elected Governor, Lieutenant Governor, and Attorney General shall be certified by the State Board to the clerks of the House of Delegates and Senate. The name of any officer shared by more than one county or city, or any combination thereof, shall be certified by the State Board to the clerk of the circuit court having jurisdiction in each affected county or city. The names of the persons elected to soil and water conservation districts shall be certified by the State Board to the Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-287, 24-289; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-155; 1974, c. 428; 1980, c. 639; 1983, c. 461; 1993, c. 641; 2001, c. 53; 2006, cc. 787, 892.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 53 added the last sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 787 and 892 are identical, and substituted “§

24.2-948.2

” for “§ 24.2-922” in the first sentence.